Utah statutes.
59-12-704.   Distribution of revenues -- Advisory board creation --
Determining operating expenses.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (3)(b) and (5), and subject to the
requirements of this section, any revenues collected by a county of the first
class under this part shall be distributed annually by the county legislative
body to support recreational and zoological facilities and botanical,
cultural, and zoological organizations within that first class county as
follows:
(a)  30% of the revenue collected by the county under this section shall be
distributed by the county legislative body to support recreational facilities
located within the county;
(b) (i)  subject to Subsection (1)(b)(ii) and except as provided in Subsection
(1)(b)(iii), 12-1/8% of the revenue collected by the county under this section
shall be distributed by the county legislative body to support no more than
three zoological facilities and organizations located within the county, with
94.5% of that revenue being distributed to zoological facilities and
organizations with average annual operating expenses of $2,000,000 or more and
5.5% of that revenue being distributed to zoological facilities and
organizations with average annual operating expenses of less than $2,000,000;
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(b)(iii), the county legislative
body shall distribute the money described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) among the
zoological facilities and organizations in proportion to their average annual
operating expenses as determined under Subsection (3); and
(iii)  if a zoological facility or organization is created or relocated within
the county after June 1, 2003, the county legislative body shall distribute
the money described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) as it determines appropriate;
(c) (i)  48-7/8% of the revenue collected by the county under this section
shall be distributed to no more than 23 botanical and cultural organizations
with average annual operating expenses of more than $250,000 as determined
under Subsection (3);
(ii)  subject to Subsection (1)(c)(iii), the county legislative body shall
distribute the money described in Subsection (1)(c)(i) among the organizations
and in proportion to their average annual operating expenses as determined
under Subsection (3); and
(iii)  the amount distributed to any organization described in Subsection
(1)(c)(i) may not exceed 35% of the organization's operating budget; and
(d) (i)  9% of the revenue collected by the county under this section shall be
distributed to botanical and cultural organizations that do not receive
revenue under Subsection (1)(c)(i); and
(ii)  the county legislative body shall determine how the money shall be
distributed among the organizations described in Subsection (1)(d)(i).
(2) (a)  The county legislative body of each county shall create an advisory
board to advise the county legislative body on disbursement of funds to
botanical and cultural organizations under Subsection (1)(c)(i).
(b) (i)  The advisory board under Subsection (2)(a) shall consist of seven
members appointed by the county legislative body.
(ii)  In a county of the first class, two of the seven members of the advisory
board under Subsection (2)(a) shall be appointed from the Utah Arts Council.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), to be eligible to receive
money collected by the county under this part, a botanical, cultural, and
zoological organization located within a county of the first class shall,
every three years:
(i)  calculate their average annual operating expenses based upon audited
operating expenses for three preceding fiscal years; and
(ii)  submit to the appropriate county legislative body:
(A)  a verified audit of annual operating expenses for each of those three
preceding fiscal years; and
(B)  the average annual operating expenses as calculated under Subsection
(3)(a)(i).
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), the county legislative body may waive
the operating expenses reporting requirements under Subsection (3)(a) for
organizations described in Subsection (1)(d)(i).
(4)  When calculating average annual operating expenses as described in
Subsection (3), each botanical, cultural, and zoological organization shall
use the same three-year fiscal period as determined by the county legislative
body.
(5) (a)  By July 1 of each year, the county legislative body of a first class
county may index the threshold amount in Subsections (1)(c) and (d).
(b)  Any change under Subsection (5)(a) shall be rounded off to the nearest
$100.
(6) (a)  Beginning on July 1, 2001, in a county except for a county of the
first class, the county legislative body shall by ordinance provide for the
distribution of the entire amount of the revenues generated by the tax imposed
by this section as provided in this Subsection (6).
(b)  Pursuant to an interlocal agreement established in accordance with Title
11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, a county described in Subsection
(6)(a) may distribute to a city, town, or political subdivision within the
county revenues generated by a tax under this part.
(c)  The revenues distributed under Subsection (6)(a) or (b) shall be used for
one or more organizations or facilities defined in Section 59-12-702
regardless of whether the revenues are distributed:
(i)  directly by the county described in Subsection (6)(a) to be used for an
organization or facility defined in Section 59-12-702; or
(ii)  in accordance with an interlocal agreement described in Subsection
(6)(b).
(7)  A county legislative body may retain up to 1.5% of the proceeds from a
tax under this part for the cost of administering the provisions of this part.
(8)  The commission may retain an amount not to exceed 1-1/2% of the tax
collected under this part for the cost of administering this part.
